Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2604
Delegation of powers
by parent or guardian.

A parent or a guardian of
a minor or incapacitated person, by a properly executed power of attorney,
may delegate to another person, for a period not exceeding six months, any
of his or her powers
regarding care, custody, or property of the minor child or ward, except his or her power to consent to
marriage or adoption of a minor ward. A
parent or guardian of a minor who is at least eighteen years of age and who
is not a ward of the state, by a properly executed power of attorney, may
delegate to such minor, for a period not exceeding one year, the parent's
or guardian's power to consent to such minor's own health care and medical
treatment.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 222, UPC § 5-104;

Laws 2010, LB226, § 1.